New York, session 2025-2026, A1670.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 611 of the correction law, as 2 amended by chapter 17 of the laws of 2016, paragraph (c) as separately 3 amended by chapters 322 and 621 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read 4 as follows: 5 1. (a) If a [woman] person confined in any institution or local 6 correctional facility [be] is pregnant and about to give birth [to a 7 child], or needs medical care elsewhere related to pregnancy or any 8 pregnancy outcome, including birth, abortion, miscarriage and still- 9 birth, the superintendent or sheriff in charge of such institution or 10 facility, a reasonable time before the anticipated birth [of such child] 11 or need for such other care, as determined by such person's health care 12 provider, or if unavailable, by personnel providing medical services to 13 such person, in accordance with medical best practices and standards of 14 care, shall cause such [woman] person to be removed from such institu- 15 tion or facility and provided with comfortable accommodations, mainte- 16 nance and medical care elsewhere[,]. This shall be done under such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04205-11-6 A. 1670--B 2 1 supervision and safeguards to prevent [her] their escape from custody as 2 the superintendent or sheriff or [his or her] their designee may deter- 3 mine except as provided by paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (g), and (h) of 4 this subdivision. 5 (b) No restraints of any kind shall be used during transport of such 6 [woman] person, a [woman] person who is known to be pregnant or known to 7 be within twelve weeks after any pregnancy outcome, including birth, 8 abortion, miscarriage, and stillbirth, by correctional personnel or 9 personnel providing medical services to the institution or local correc- 10 tional facility[, or a woman within eight weeks after delivery or preg- 11 nancy outcome,]. This includes, but is not limited to, persons receiv- 12 ing care at a hospital or medical facility or in labor or delivery, and 13 is absent extraordinary circumstances in which[: 14 i. the superintendent or sheriff or his or her designee in consulta- 15 tion with the medical professional responsible for the institution has 16 made an individualized determination that restraints are necessary to 17 prevent such woman from injuring herself or medical or correctional 18 personnel or others and cannot reasonably be restrained by other means, 19 including the use of additional personnel; or 20 ii.], during transport the correctional personnel directly responsible 21 for the transport of such a [woman] person determine that an emergency 22 has arisen in which restraints are necessary because the [woman] person 23 poses an immediate risk of serious injury to [herself] themself or 24 medical or correctional personnel or others and cannot reasonably be 25 restrained by other means. 26 [(b)] (c) If a determination has been made pursuant to [subparagraph i 27 or ii of] paragraph [(a)] (b) of this subdivision that extraordinary 28 circumstances exist then restraints shall be limited to wrist restraints 29 in front of the body. The [superintendent or sheriff or his or her 30 designee pursuant to subparagraph i of paragraph (a) of this subdivision 31 or] correctional personnel pursuant to [subparagraph ii of] paragraph 32 [(a)] (b) of this subdivision shall document in writing the facts upon 33 which the finding of extraordinary circumstances were based within five 34 days of the use of such restraints and shall also document the type of 35 restraints used and the length of time such restraints were used. 36 [(c) No restraints of any kind shall be used when such woman is in 37 labor, admitted to a hospital, institution or clinic for delivery, or 38 recovering after giving birth. Any such personnel as may be necessary to 39 supervise the woman during transport to and from and during her stay at 40 the hospital, institution or clinic shall be provided to ensure adequate 41 care, custody and control of the woman, except that no] 42 (d) No correctional staff shall be present in the [delivery] patient's 43 room during [the birth of a baby] medical care related to all pregnancy 44 outcomes including birth, abortion, miscarriage, and stillbirth and 45 during and after labor unless requested by the medical staff [supervis- 46 ing] providing such [delivery] care when the situation poses a clear 47 risk of danger to the medical staff or others or by the [woman giving 48 birth] person receiving such care. If a determination has been made 49 pursuant to this subdivision that correctional staff shall be present, 50 correctional personnel shall document in writing within five days: the 51 facts, as reported by medical staff, on which the determination was 52 based; the nature of the care being provided; and what, if any, alterna- 53 tives were attempted to avoid having correctional staff present and why 54 they failed. 55 (e) The [woman] person shall be permitted to have at least one support 56 person of [her] their choosing accompany [her in the delivery room and A. 1670--B 3 1 when such woman is in labor and recovering after giving birth] them to a 2 hospital or medical facility for labor, birth, postpartum recovery and 3 counseling and medical care related to all pregnancy outcomes including 4 birth, abortion, miscarriage and stillbirth and shall be permitted to 5 remain with such support person for the duration of their stay in the 6 hospital or medical facility subject to the visitation rules of that 7 hospital or medical facility. A support person shall not need to have 8 visited the [woman] person at a correctional facility prior to serving 9 as a support person[. A person] and may not be denied eligibility to 10 serve as a support person solely on the basis of a past criminal 11 conviction or that such support person is on probation, conditional 12 release, parole or post release supervision. Any decision by an [agency] 13 institution or local correctional facility to deny a [woman's] request 14 [to have] for a specific support person [serve as a support person] 15 shall be made with reasons specified in writing within five days of 16 [her] the request and promptly provided to the [woman] person making 17 the request. A support person shall be notified immediately after such 18 [woman] person goes into labor, [or immediately after a caesarean] is 19 scheduled for labor induction or scheduled for a cesarean section [or 20 termination], is identified as having a miscarriage or stillbirth, or is 21 scheduled for medical care for any pregnancy outcome, including birth, 22 abortion, miscarriage, and stillbirth. If available, a doula, midwife or 23 other birthing support specialist may also assist during labor [and], 24 delivery [in addition to at least one support person of the woman's 25 choosing. Any woman confined in a state or local correctional facility 26 shall receive notice in writing in a language and manner understandable 27 to her about the requirements of this section upon her admission to such 28 state or local correctional facility and again when she is known to be 29 pregnant. The superintendent or sheriff shall publish notice of the 30 requirements of this section in prominent locations where medical care 31 is provided], postpartum recovery, and during medical care for and 32 recovery from any pregnancy outcome including birth, abortion, miscar- 33 riage, and stillbirth. The superintendent or sheriff or [his or her] 34 their designee shall cause such [woman] person to be subject to return 35 to such institution or local correctional facility [as soon] after the 36 birth of [her] their child or other pregnancy outcome or provision of 37 counseling and medical care related to pregnancy or any pregnancy 38 outcome as the state of [her] their health will permit as determined by 39 the medical professional responsible for the care of such [woman] 40 person. [If such woman is confined in a local correctional facility, the 41 expense of such accommodation, maintenance and medical care shall be 42 paid by such woman or her relatives or from any available funds of the 43 local correctional facility and if not available from such sources, 44 shall be a charge upon the county, city or town in which is located the 45 court from which such incarcerated individual was committed to such 46 local correctional facility. If such woman is confined in any institu- 47 tion under the control of the department, the expense of such accommo- 48 dation, maintenance and medical care shall be paid by such woman or her 49 relatives and if not available from such sources, such maintenance and 50 medical care shall be paid by the state. In cases where payment of such 51 accommodations, maintenance and medical care is assumed by the county, 52 city or town from which such incarcerated individual was committed the 53 payor shall make payment by issuing payment instrument in favor of the 54 agency or individual that provided such accommodations and services, 55 after certification has been made by the head of the institution to 56 which the incarcerated individual was legally confined, that the charges A. 1670--B 4 1 for such accommodations, maintenance and medical care were necessary and 2 are just, and that the institution has no available funds for such 3 purpose. 4 (d)] (f) Any [woman] person confined in an institution or local 5 correctional facility shall receive notice in writing in a language and 6 manner understandable to [her] them about the requirements of this 7 section upon [her] their admission to an institution or local correc- 8 tional facility and again when [she is] they are known to be pregnant. 9 The superintendent or sheriff shall publish notice of the requirements 10 of this section in prominent locations where medical care is provided. 11 The department and the sheriff shall provide annual training on 12 provisions of this section to all correctional personnel who are 13 involved in the transportation, supervision or medical care of incarcer- 14 ated [women] persons. 15 [(e)] (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, force against a 16 pregnant person or any person within twelve weeks after delivery or 17 pregnancy outcome shall not be used, except as a last resort, and then 18 only in situations in which the staff member reasonably believes that 19 force is necessary to protect themselves, the incarcerated individual, 20 or a third person from what they reasonably believe to be the use or 21 imminent use of physical force by such individual that could cause death 22 or serious physical injury. The use of spit masks, chemical agents, 23 tasers, weapons, chokeholds or blows to the body against a pregnant 24 person or any person within twelve weeks after delivery or pregnancy 25 outcome shall be strictly prohibited. 26 (h) If a determination has been made pursuant to paragraph (g) of this 27 subdivision that force must be used, correctional personnel shall docu- 28 ment in writing within five days of the use of such force: the facts 29 from which the finding that force was necessary as a last resort were 30 based, what non-force alternatives were attempted and why they failed, 31 the type or types of force used, the length of time such force was used, 32 and a description of each injury incurred by the incarcerated person. 33 (i) i. The department shall report annually to the governor, the 34 temporary president of the senate, the minority leader of the senate, 35 the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the assembly, the 36 chairperson of the senate crime victims, crime and correction committee 37 and the chairperson of the assembly correction committee concerning: 38 (A) every use of restraints and force on a [woman] person under this 39 section, including the reason such restraint was used, the type of 40 restraint used and the length of time such restraint was used pursuant 41 to paragraph [(b)] (c) of this subdivision, but shall exclude [individ- 42 ual identifying] personally identifiable information; and 43 (B) every use of force on a person under this section, including the 44 reason such force was used, what non-force alternatives were attempted 45 and why they failed, the type or types of force used, the length of time 46 such force was used, and a description of each injury incurred by the 47 incarcerated person pursuant to paragraph (h) of this subdivision, but 48 shall exclude personally identifiable information. 49 ii. The sheriff of each county shall report at least annually to the 50 commission, in a form and manner prescribed by the commission[,]: 51 (A) every use of restraints and force on a [woman] person under this 52 section, including the reason such restraint was used, the type of 53 restraint used and the length of time such restraint was used pursuant 54 to paragraph [(b)] (c) of this subdivision, [annually to the commission] 55 but shall exclude personally identifiable information; and A. 1670--B 5 1 (B) every use of force on a person under this section, including the 2 reason such force was used, what non-force alternatives were attempted 3 and why they failed, the type or types of force used, the length of time 4 such force was used, and a description of each injury incurred by the 5 incarcerated person pursuant to paragraph (h) of this subdivision, but 6 shall exclude personally identifiable information. The commission shall 7 include such information in its annual report pursuant to section 8 forty-five of this chapter, but shall exclude identifying information 9 from such report. 10 iii. Reports required by this section shall be posted on the websites 11 maintained by the department and the commission. 12 (j) The department and the commission shall issue uniform minimum 13 standards and procedures regarding the implementation of this subdivi- 14 sion within one hundred eighty days of the effective date of the chapter 15 of the laws of two thousand twenty-six that amended this subdivision. 16 These standards shall be developed in consultation with medical, social 17 work, and mental health professionals, including those with specializa- 18 tions in reproductive health care, pediatrics, child development, and 19 postpartum mental health, as well as advocates for pregnant people who 20 are incarcerated, including presently and formerly incarcerated individ- 21 uals. 22 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-t-1 to 23 read as follows: 24 § 837-t-1. Use of restraints on pregnant and post-pregnant persons by 25 law enforcement. 1.(a) Where a person who is known to be pregnant, in 26 labor or delivery, or twelve weeks post-pregnancy is in the custody of 27 law enforcement, subject to custodial interrogation, or has their free- 28 dom of action restricted by law enforcement in any significant way, the 29 use of restraints of any kind by law enforcement personnel shall be 30 prohibited except: 31 (i) during arrest, if exigent circumstances arise and the person 32 cannot reasonably be restrained by other means; or 33 (ii) during transport of the person, if the person directly responsi- 34 ble for such transport determines that an emergency has arisen in which 35 restraints are necessary due to an immediate risk of serious injury to 36 themself or medical or law enforcement personnel or others. 37 (b) Restraints used pursuant to this section shall be for the shortest 38 duration possible and restraints shall be limited to wrist restraints in 39 front of the body. 40 (c) Restraints shall never be used on a person who is in labor, 41 notwithstanding the exceptions provided in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of 42 paragraph (a) of this subdivision. 43 (d) The provisions of this section shall at minimum apply to police 44 stations, holding facilities for prisoners, prosecutors' offices, 45 medical areas and hospitals, and any facility where persons are held in 46 detention in connection with criminal or juvenile delinquency charges 47 that have been or may be filed against them, as well as during transfer 48 to and from such locations. A person's disclosure of their status shall 49 serve as sufficient notice to law enforcement under this provision. 50 2. (a) If restraints are used on a person who is pregnant or post- 51 pregnancy contrary to this section, the law enforcement personnel 52 responsible for such use of restraints shall document in writing within 53 five days: the reason such restraints were used, the type of restraints 54 used, and the length of time such restraints were used. 55 (b) The chief of every police department, county sheriff, and the 56 superintendent of state police shall report to the division, in a form A. 1670--B 6 1 and manner prescribed by the division, all such uses of restraints, 2 disaggregated by county, and shall include the following information, 3 but shall exclude personally identifiable information: 4 (i) the reason restraints were used; 5 (ii) the type of restraints used; 6 (iii) the length of time such restraints were used; 7 (iv) the race, ethnicity, age, and gender identity of the individual; 8 and 9 (v) the zip code or location where the use of restraints occurred. 10 (c) The division shall make the information reported pursuant to this 11 subdivision available to the public by posting it on the website of the 12 division, excluding personally identifiable information. 13 (d) The division shall submit to the governor and the legislature an 14 annual report of all uses of restraints on pregnant and post-pregnant 15 persons by law enforcement, including the information reported pursuant 16 to this subdivision, but shall exclude personally identifying informa- 17 tion. 18 (e) The division may promulgate regulations to effectuate the report- 19 ing required by this subdivision. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.